District of Columbia statutes.
42-3141.04

Deemed authorization to abate.

If the owner does not reply as provided for in § 42-3141.03(b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3), the owner shall be deemed to have authorized the Mayor to abate the graffiti. The Mayor may then abate the graffiti as if the owner had provided authorization under § 42-3141.03(b)(2).

History

Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 5, 57 DCR 4353

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3141.11.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-389, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4332).